Utah statutes.
41-6a-1402.   Stopping or parking on roadways -- Angle parking -- Traffic-
control devices prohibiting or restricting.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a vehicle stopped or parked
on a two-way roadway shall be stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels:
(a)  parallel to and within 12 inches of the right-hand curb; or
(b)  as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.
(2)  Except when otherwise provided by local ordinance, a vehicle stopped or
parked on a one-way roadway shall be stopped or parked parallel to the curb or
edge of the roadway in the direction of authorized traffic movement with its:
(a)  right-hand wheels:
(i)  within 12 inches of the right-hand curb; or
(ii)  as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder; or
(b)  left-hand wheels:
(i)  within 12 inches of the left-hand curb; or
(ii)  as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), local highway authorities
may by ordinance permit angle parking on any roadway.
(b)  Angle parking is not permitted on any federal-aid or state highway unless
the Department of Transportation has determined that the roadway is of
sufficient width to permit angle parking without interfering with the free
movement of traffic.
(4) (a)  The Department of Transportation, with respect to highways under its
jurisdiction, may place traffic-control devices prohibiting or restricting the
stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on a highway where:
(i)  the stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to those using the
highway; or
(ii)  the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere
with the free movement of traffic.
(b)  A person may not stop, stand, or park a vehicle in violation of the
restriction indicated by the devices under Subsection (4)(a).
